Hawaii statutes.
§431:10C-213.5 Binding arbitration.
(a) A claimant or defendant shall have the option to elect arbitration to
resolve a claim in tort that is covered by motor vehicle liability insurance.

(b) A claimant or defendant may submit any
dispute relating to a tort claim to binding arbitration by either filing a
written request with the clerk of the circuit court in the circuit where the
accident occurred or by agreement.

(c) A claimant or defendant shall have the
opportunity to decline arbitration.

(d) Except as otherwise provided herein,
arbitration shall be in accordance with and governed by chapter 658A.

(e) Fees and costs of arbitration shall be
borne equally by the parties, unless otherwise agreed to by the parties.

(f) Collection of any arbitration award issued
under this section shall be limited to the applicable liability policy limit,
unless the insured tortfeasor otherwise agrees.

(g) The amount of an arbitration award under
this section shall not be binding on a subsequent underinsured motorist claim.
[L 1998, c 275, §3; am L 2000, c 181, §1; am L 2001, c 265, §4]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next